Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.015

Medical director—Appointment of personnel.

The director shall designate a medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW. The director shall also appoint such professional personnel and other assistants and employees, including professional medical screeners, as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and chapters 74.09, 71.05, 71.24, and 71.34 RCW and other applicable law. The medical screeners must be supervised by one or more physicians whom the director or the director's designee shall appoint.

[ 2023 c 51 s 5; 2018 c 201 s 7001; 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 55; 2000 c 5 s 16.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 201: See notes following RCW 41.05.018.

Effective date—Findings—Intent—Report—Agency transfer—References to head of health care authority—Draft legislation—2011 1st sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 74.09.010.

Intent—Purpose—2000 c 5: See RCW 48.43.500.

Application—Short title—Captions not law—Construction—Severability—Application to contracts—Effective dates—2000 c 5: See notes following RCW 48.43.500.